Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.130

Excess of expenditures, liability.

Expenditures made, liabilities incurred, or warrants issued in excess of any of the detailed budget appropriations or as revised by transfer as in RCW 36.40.100 or 36.40.120 provided shall not be a liability of the county, but the official making or incurring such expenditure or issuing such warrant shall be liable therefor personally and upon his or her official bond. The county auditor shall issue no warrant and the county commissioners shall approve no claim for any expenditure in excess of the detailed budget appropriations or as revised under the provisions of RCW 36.40.100 through 36.40.130, except upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or for emergencies as hereinafter provided.

[ 2009 c 337 s 10; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.130. Prior: 1945 c 201 s 1, part; 1943 c 66 s 1, part; 1927 c 301 s 1, part; 1923 c 164 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3997-5, part.]